Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144E.35, is amended to read: 144E.35 REIMBURSEMENT TO AMBULANCE SERVICES FOR deleted text begin VOLUNTEERdeleted text end EDUCATION COSTS. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Repayment for volunteerdeleted text end new text begin Reimbursement fornew text end educationnew text begin costs; ambulance service eligibilitynew text end . deleted text begin A licensed ambulance service shall be reimbursed by the director for the necessary expense of the initial education of a volunteer ambulance attendant upon successful completion by the attendant of an EMT education course, or a continuing education course for EMT care, or both, which has been approved by the director, pursuant to section 144E.285deleted text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in subdivision 3, the director must reimburse all eligible Minnesota licensed ambulance services that apply for reimbursement under this section for the necessary expenses of initial EMR and EMT education and EMR and EMT continuing education for ambulance attendants who satisfy the criteria in subdivision 2new text end . Reimbursement may include tuition, transportation, food, lodging, hourly payment for the time spent in the education course, and other necessary expenditures, except that in no instance shall a deleted text begin volunteerdeleted text end new text begin licensednew text end ambulance deleted text begin attendantdeleted text end new text begin servicenew text end be reimbursed more than deleted text begin $900deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) $1,200new text end fornew text begin an ambulance attendant'snew text end successful completion of an initial new text begin EMT new text end education coursedeleted text begin , and $375deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) $400new text end fornew text begin an ambulance attendant'snew text end successful completion of deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin an EMTnew text end continuing education coursenew text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) $600 for an ambulance attendant's successful completion of an initial EMR education course; and new text end new text begin (4) $200 for an ambulance attendant's successful completion of an EMR continuing education coursenew text end . new text begin (b) To be eligible for reimbursement, a licensed ambulance service must have responded to 5,000 or fewer calls in the most recent calendar year. new text end Subd. 2. deleted text begin Reimbursement provisionsdeleted text end new text begin Ambulance attendant criterianew text end . Reimbursement must be paid under deleted text begin provisions ofdeleted text end this section when documentation is provided to the director that the deleted text begin individualdeleted text end new text begin ambulance attendant:new text end new text begin (1) successfully completed an initial EMR or EMT education course approved by the director under section 144E.285, a continuing education course for EMR or EMT care approved by the director under section 144E.285, or both; and new text end new text begin (2) new text end has served for one year from the date of the final certification exam as an active member of a Minnesota licensed ambulance service. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Discontinuance of reimbursement. new text end new text begin If the state is unable to meet its financial obligations under subdivision 1 as the obligations become due, the director must take all necessary steps to discontinue reimbursing ambulance services for education costs until the state is again able to meet the financial obligations under subdivision 1 as the obligations become due. An ambulance service whose application is not approved due to lack of funding may resubmit the application in the next fiscal year. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Office of Emergency Medical Services for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 144E.35. new text end